Florida, session 2026, HB1293.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 817.537, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
817.537 Fraudulent entry of a residential dwelling unit.—
(1) As used in this section, the terms "dwelling unit,"
"landlord," and "rental agreement" have the same meanings as
provided in s. 83.43.
(2) A person may not enter into and take possession of a
residential dwelling unit by knowingly and willfully:
(a) Making or causing to be made any materially false
statement, in writing, relating to the person's identity in any
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1293 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1293 2026 Legislature
rental application for a residential tenancy.
(b) Presenting forged, fictitious, or counterfeit
documents to the landlord of a residential dwelling unit,
including, but not limited to, a driver license, an
identification card, a bank statement, or a paystub.
(c) Impersonating another person in whose name a rental
application is submitted to a landlord for the purpose of
executing a rental agreement or taking possession of a
residential dwelling unit.
(3) A person who violates this section commits the offense
of fraudulent entry of a residential dwelling unit, which is a
felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
83.56, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
83.56 Termination of rental agreement.—
(2) If the tenant materially fails to comply with s. 83.52
or material provisions of the rental agreement, other than a
failure to pay rent, or reasonable rules or regulations, the
landlord may:
(a) If such noncompliance is of a nature that the tenant
should not be given an opportunity to cure it or if the
noncompliance constitutes a subsequent or continuing
noncompliance within 12 months of a written warning by the
landlord of a similar violation, deliver a written notice to the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1293 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1293 2026 Legislature
tenant specifying the noncompliance and the landlord's intent to
terminate the rental agreement by reason thereof. Examples of
noncompliance which are of a nature that the tenant should not
be given an opportunity to cure include, but are not limited to,
destruction, damage, or misuse of the landlord's or other
tenants' property by intentional act; an act of fraudulent entry
of a residential dwelling unit which violates s. 817.537(2),
regardless of whether criminal proceedings have commenced; or a
subsequent or continued unreasonable disturbance. In such event,
the landlord may terminate the rental agreement, and the tenant
shall have 7 days from the date that the notice is delivered to
vacate the premises. The notice shall be in substantially the
following form:
You are advised that your lease is terminated effective
immediately. You shall have 7 days from the delivery of this
letter to vacate the premises. This action is taken because
...(cite the noncompliance)....
Section 3. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1293 -01-er